Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2398.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-32-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-32 entitled "Obstructing
Justice" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-32-2. False report of crime.
(a) Every person who shall knowingly make or cause to be made a false statement of a
crime, either oral or written, with intent that it be relied upon by a police officer of any city or town
or by any member of the state police, shall be deemed guilty of obstructing an officer and shall be
imprisoned not exceeding one year and/or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), and
shall in addition to this imprisonment and/or fine be ordered to make restitution to the person falsely
accused of a crime for any damage which the person sustained as a result of the false complaint.
(b) Every person who shall knowingly make or cause to be made a false statement of a
crime that carries a sentence of imprisonment of not less than five (5) years nor more than twenty
(20) years, either oral or written, with intent that it be relied upon by a police officer of any city or
town or by any member of the state police, shall be deemed guilty of a felony and, upon conviction,
shall be imprisoned not less than one year nor more than five (5) years.
(c) Every person who shall knowingly make or cause to be made a false statement of a
crime that carries a sentence of imprisonment of not less than twenty (20) years, either oral or
written, with intent that it be relied upon by a police officer of any city or town or by any member
of the state police, shall be deemed guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned not
less than five (5) years nor more than twenty (20) years.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004357
========
LC004357 - Page 2 of 3